Colorado, session 2026A, HB1243.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds that:
(a) Second- and third-trimester abortion clinics are not currently
regulated by the Colorado department of public health and environment,
also referred to as "CDPHE";
(b) CDPHE is authorized to license, regulate, and inspect a wide
spectrum of health-care facilities to ensure public health and safety,
including freestanding emergency departments, critical access hospitals,
psychiatric hospitals, community clinics, rehabilitation hospitals,
convalescent centers, facilities for persons with intellectual and
developmental disabilities, nursing care facilities, hospice care, assisted
living residences, dialysis treatment clinics, ambulatory surgical centers,
birthing centers, and home care agencies;
(c) Gynecologic dilation and curettage, known as a "D&C", and
second- and third-trimester obstetric D&C, dilation and evacuation,
dilation and extraction, and inductions of labor are all normally performed
in facilities regulated by CDPHE. The exception to this protocol is when
these same procedures are used during an induced abortion at abortion
clinics in the second and third trimester of a pregnancy.
(d) Birthing centers, which are licensed, regulated, and inspected
by CDPHE, are prohibited from inducing labor because of the associated
risks, but second- and third-trimester abortion clinics routinely use
labor-inducing drugs without any CDPHE oversight;
(e) Second- and third-trimester abortion procedures are associated
with significant risk. There is a 10% risk that a complication will arise
-2- HB26-1243

during a second-trimester abortion, including cervical laceration,
hemorrhage, uterine atony, anesthesia complications, uterine perforation,
disseminated intravascular coagulation, and retained products of
conception, and more than a 1.5% risk that a severe complication will
arise, including hospitalization, transfusion, or further surgical
intervention. The risk from instrument-assisted third-trimester dilation
and extraction abortions is substantial. Blood loss increases by 7% for
each additional week of gestational age.
(f) The risk of dying from an abortion increases 38% for each
week of gestation after 8 weeks. In the early second trimester, the risk of
dying from an induced abortion is twice the risk of dying from natural
childbirth, and it is greater than the risk of dying from procedures
performed at ambulatory surgical centers in the United States and Canada.
Birthing centers and ambulatory surgical centers are both regulated by
CDPHE.
(g) Within the past year, Colorado became aware of at least one
maternal death directly attributable to a complication of a
second-trimester abortion, underscoring the seriousness of these risks and
the urgent need for oversight; and
(h) The Colorado Maternal Mortality Review Committee, also
referred to as the "MMRC", recommends strategies to achieve equity in
maternal health outcomes and ways to reduce the incidence of
preventable maternal mortality and morbidity. Pregnancy-associated
mortality and pregnancy-related maternal mortality include
abortion-associated mortality and abortion-related maternal mortality. The
MMRC recommends the use of evidence-based patient safety bundles,
evidence-based screening tools, and improved coordination of care as key
-3- HB26-1243

elements to reduce maternal mortality. It is difficult to ensure
implementation of the MMRC recommendations without a licensing,
regulation, and inspection process for second- and third-trimester abortion
clinics.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that unregulated
second- and third-trimester abortion clinics place Colorado women's lives
in jeopardy and should be regulated by CDPHE.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 25-1.5-103, amend
(1)(a)(I)(A); and add (2)(e) as follows:
25-1.5-103. Health facilities - powers and duties of department
- rules - limitations on rules - definitions - repeal.
(1) The department has, in addition to all other powers and duties
imposed upon it by law, the powers and duties provided in this section as
follows:
(a) (I) (A) To annually license and to establish and enforce
standards for the operation of general hospitals, hospital units as defined
in section 25-3-101 (2), freestanding emergency departments as defined
in section 25-1.5-114, critical access hospitals as defined in section
25-1.5-114.5, psychiatric hospitals, community clinics, rehabilitation
hospitals, convalescent centers, facilities for persons with intellectual and
developmental disabilities, nursing care facilities, hospice care, assisted
living residences, dialysis treatment clinics, ambulatory surgical centers,
birthing centers, SECOND- AND THIRD-TRIMESTER ABORTION CLINICS,
home care agencies, and other facilities of a like nature, except those
wholly owned and operated by a governmental unit or agency.
(2) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(e) "SECOND- AND THIRD-TRIMESTER ABORTION CLINIC" MEANS A
-4- HB26-1243

FACILITY THAT PERFORMS MEDICAL OR SURGICAL INDUCED ABORTIONS
AFTER THE FIRST TRIMESTER OF PREGNANCY AND THAT IS NOT OTHERWISE
PART OF ANOTHER TYPE OF FACILITY REQUIRED TO BE LICENSED BY THE
DEPARTMENT PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(a)(I)(A) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-5- HB26-1243